Utah statutes.
20A-1-303.   Determining results.

(1) (a)  When one person is to be elected or nominated, the person receiving the highest number of votes at any:

(i)  election for any office to be filled at that election is elected to that office; and

(ii)  primary for nomination for any office is nominated for that office.

(b)  When more than one person is to be elected or nominated, the persons receiving the highest number of votes at any:

(i)  election for any office to filled at that election are elected to that office; and

(ii)  primary for nomination for any office are nominated for that office.

(2)  Any ballot proposition submitted to voters for their approval or rejection:

(a)  passes if the number of "yes" votes is greater than the number of "no" votes; and

(b)  fails if:

(i)  the number of "yes" votes equal the number of "no" votes; or

(ii)  the number of "no" votes is greater than the number of "yes" votes.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1993 General Session

